Maine, session 132, LD738.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 4 MRSA §803, as corrected by RR 2021, c. 1, Pt. B, §22, is amended to read:
§803. Qualifications for taking bar examination
A person may qualify to take the examination for admission to the bar of the State in
accordance with this section or section 803-A.
1. Evidence of graduation. Before taking the examination for admission to the bar
of the State, each applicant under this section shall produce to a the board of bar examiners
established by the Supreme Judicial Court pursuant to section 801 satisfactory evidence
that the applicant graduated with a bachelor's degree from an accredited college or
university or that the applicant successfully completed at least 2 years' work as a candidate
for that degree at an accredited college or university.
2. Further qualifications. Each applicant under this section shall, in addition to the
requirements under subsection 1, produce to a the board of bar examiners satisfactory
evidence that the applicant:
A. Graduated from a law school accredited by the American Bar Association;
B. Graduated from a law school accredited by the United States jurisdiction in which
it is located, that the applicant has been admitted to practice by examination in one or
more jurisdictions within the United States and has been in active practice there for at
least 3 years;
C. Graduated from a foreign law school with a legal education that, in the board's
opinion, is equivalent to that provided in those law schools accredited by the American
Bar Association; or
D. Successfully completed 2/3 of the requirements for graduation from a law school
accredited by the American Bar Association and then pursued the study of law in the
office of an attorney within the State for at least one year.
3. Eligibility for examination. When an applicant has satisfied a the board of bar
examiners that these the requirements of this section have been fulfilled and has paid a fee
fixed by the Supreme Judicial Court, that applicant is eligible to take the examinations
prepared or adopted by the board to determine if that applicant has the qualifications
required by this chapter for admission to the bar.
Sec. 2. 4 MRSA §803-A is enacted to read:
§803-A. Qualifications for taking bar examination; law office study program
This section provides an alternative to section 803 for a person to qualify to take the
examination for admission to the bar of the State.
1. Definitions. For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Board" means the board of bar examiners established by the Supreme Judicial
Court pursuant to section 801.
B. "Week of study" means at least 25 hours of study during a period of 7 consecutive
days or at least 30 hours of study during a period of 14 consecutive days.
Page 1 - 132LR1633(01)

C. "Year of study" means at least 44 weeks of study during a period of 12 consecutive
calendar months.
2. Education or experience prior to law office study. Before beginning a law office
study program under subsection 3, an applicant under this section shall produce to the board
satisfactory evidence that the applicant has graduated with a bachelor's degree from an
accredited college or university in this country; has graduated with a bachelor's degree from
a college or university in another country that is accredited under the laws of that country;
or has worked as a paralegal for the equivalent of 4 years on a full-time basis.
3. Law office study program; requirements. An applicant for the examination for
admission to the bar of the State under this section shall produce to the board satisfactory
evidence that the applicant:
A. Pursued a systematic course of legal study designed to prepare the applicant for the
general practice of law for at least 4 years in the office of and under the supervision of
a judge or an attorney in this State who has been a member of the bar in good standing
for at least 3 years before the applicant's course of legal study began. The course of
legal study must include, at a minimum, a study of the subjects tested on each of the
examinations prepared or adopted by the board to determine if an applicant has the
qualifications required by this chapter for admission to the bar. The supervising judge
or attorney may enlist the assistance of other judges and attorneys to provide additional
supervision for the applicant during portions of the applicant's course of legal study for
purposes of providing the applicant with the greatest possible breadth of experience
and instruction;
B. Submitted in a form or format required by the board a commencement notice within
30 days after commencing a law office study program under this subsection and, if
applicable, a transfer notice within 30 days after transferring the applicant's law office
study program to a new supervising judge or attorney. The commencement or transfer
notice must be signed by the supervising judge or attorney, must include the date that
the law office study program began and must be accompanied by a certification from
the supervising judge or attorney that the supervising judge or attorney personally
investigated the moral character and fitness of the applicant and that, to the best of the
supervising judge's or attorney's knowledge, the applicant meets the requirements of
good moral character and fitness to practice law;
C. Submitted in a form or format required by the board a report every 6 months during
the course of the law office study program. Each 6-month report required by this
paragraph must be signed by the applicant under oath and must include the number of
weeks of study completed during the preceding 6-month period, a detailed description
of the areas of study pursued and the tasks performed by the applicant during the
preceding 6-month period and a description of the applicant's plan of study for the next
6-month period. A report required by this paragraph must be accompanied by a
certification from the supervising judge or attorney indicating that, to the best of the
supervising judge's or attorney's knowledge, the report is accurate; and
D. Submitted within 30 days after completing the law office study program required
by this section the final 6-month report required by paragraph C and a completion
notice in a form or format approved by the board and signed by the applicant and the
supervising judge or attorney.
Page 2 - 132LR1633(01)

4. Other qualifying types of legal study; credit for years of study. The board may
award an applicant partial credit for up to 2 of the 4 years of study required by subsection
3, paragraph A if the applicant provides satisfactory evidence that the applicant recently
engaged in one of the following types of legal study and the board determines that the legal
study satisfies the purposes of the law office study program under this section:
A. Regardless of whether the applicant graduated from the law school, legal study at a
law school accredited by the American Bar Association or by the United States
jurisdiction in which it is located or at a foreign law school with a legal education that,
in the board's opinion, is equivalent to that provided by an accredited law school;
B. Legal study in a foreign jurisdiction if the applicant has been admitted to the practice
of law before a court of general jurisdiction in that foreign jurisdiction; or
C. Legal study in compliance with the requirements of a law office study program in
another state that the applicant demonstrates is substantially equivalent to legal study
under the law office study program under this section.
5. Report review and approval. A member of the board shall review each report
submitted by an applicant under subsection 3, paragraph B, C or D and, if the member has
concerns that the applicant's report does not satisfy the requirements of this section, the
member may refer the report to the board for further review. The board may require the
applicant to provide additional information in support of the report. The board shall notify
the applicant no later than the 60th day after the date that the report was submitted by the
applicant whether the board has granted credit to the applicant for the period of law office
study described in the report. If the board does not provide the applicant with a written
notice within the time required by this subsection, the board is considered to have granted
credit for the period of law office study described in the report.
6. Extension; failure to file report. The board may, for good cause shown, extend by
up to 60 days the deadline for filing any of the reports required under subsection 3,
paragraph B, C or D. If an applicant fails to file a report required under subsection 3,
paragraph B, C or D within the applicable deadline or, if an extension has been granted,
within the extended deadline, the board may deny credit to the applicant for the period of
law office study required to be described in the report or may issue a decision determining
that the applicant is ineligible to take the examinations for admission to the bar.
7. Eligibility for examination. If the board determines that an applicant under this
section has satisfied the requirements of subsections 2 and 3 and has paid a fee fixed by the
Supreme Judicial Court, the applicant is eligible to take the examinations prepared or
adopted by the board to determine if that applicant has the qualifications required by this
chapter for admission to the bar.
8. Board to create forms. By January 1, 2026, the board shall create and make
available forms for applicants to submit to the board the reports and notices required under
subsection 3, paragraphs B, C and D.
Sec. 3. Board of bar examiners fails to provide forms by deadline;
submissions without board form. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title
4, section 803-A, subsection 3, if the board of bar examiners fails to make available any of
the forms required under Title 4, section 803-A, subsection 8 by January 1, 2026, an
applicant may submit the required reports and notices under Title 4, section 803-A,
Page 3 - 132LR1633(01)

415 subsection 3, paragraphs B, C and D in any reasonable form or format, as long as those
426 reports and notices otherwise conform to the requirements of Title 4, section 803-A,
437 subsection 3, paragraphs B, C and D.